Washington statutes.
RCW 4.36.170

Material allegation defined.

A material allegation in a pleading is one essential to the claim or defense, and which could not be stricken from the pleading without leaving it insufficient.

[Code 1881 s 104; 1877 p 22 s 104; 1854 p 143 s 65; RRS s 298.]